Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1296.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding sections to read:§ 1324.1. Contributions to the Fire Company Grant Program.(a) Option.--The department shall provide for all of the following:(1) Ability of an applicant for an original or renewal driver's license or identification card to make a contribution of $5 to the Fire Company Grant Program established under 35 Pa.C.S. Ch. 78 Subch. B (relating to Fire Company Grant Program).(2) Ability of an applicant for a renewal vehicle registration to make a contribution of $5 to the Fire Company 12345678910111213141516171819 Grant Program established under 35 Pa.C.S. Ch. 78 Subch. B.(3) Ability of an applicant for a two-year vehicle registration to make, on the department's publicly accessible Internet website, a contribution of $10 to the Fire Company Grant Program established under 35 Pa.C.S. Ch. 78 Subch. B.(b) Implementation.--(1) A contribution under subsection (a) shall be added, as appropriate, to the regular fee for:(i) a renewal of a driver's license or identification card; and(ii) a renewal of a vehicle registration.(2) One contribution under subsection (a) may be made for:(i) the issuance of renewal of a driver's license or identification card; and(ii) a renewal of a vehicle registration.(c) Deposits.--The department shall determine annually the total amount designated under this section and shall report the amount to the State Treasurer who shall transfer the amount from the Motor License Fund to the account established under subsection (d).(d) Restricted account.--(1) A restricted account is established in the General Fund. The money in the account is appropriated on a continuing basis to the Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency for the purpose of making grants under 35 Pa.C.S. Ch. 78 Subch. B.(2) The account shall consist of money transferred under subsection (c) and money appropriated or otherwise made available to it.20250HB1296PN1492 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 1324.2. Contributions to the Emergency Medical Services Grant Program.(a) Option.--The department shall provide for all of the following:(1) Ability of an applicant for an original or renewal driver's license or identification card to make a contribution of $5 to the Emergency Medical Services Grant Program established under 35 Pa.C.S. Ch. 78 Subch. C (relating to Emergency Medical Services Grant Program).(2) Ability of an applicant for a renewal vehicle registration to make a contribution of $5 to the Emergency Medical Services Grant Program established under 35 Pa.C.S. Ch. 78 Subch. C.(3) Ability of an applicant for a two-year vehicle registration to make, on the department's publicly accessible Internet website, a contribution of $10 to the Emergency Medical Services Grant Program established under 35 Pa.C.S. Ch. 78 Subch. C.(b) Implementation.--(1) A contribution under subsection (a) shall be added, as appropriate, to the regular fee for:(i) a renewal of a driver's license or identification card; and(ii) renewal of a vehicle registration.(2) One contribution under subsection (a) may be made for:(i) the issuance of renewal of a driver's license or identification card; and(ii) renewal of a vehicle registration.(c) Deposits.--The department shall determine annually the 20250HB1296PN1492 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 total amount designated under this section and shall report the amount to the State Treasurer who shall transfer the amount from the Motor License Fund to the account established under subsection (d).(d) Restricted account.--(1) A restricted account is established in the General Fund. The money in the account is appropriated on a continuing basis to the Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency for the purpose of making grants under 35 Pa.C.S. Ch. 78 Subch. C.(2) The account shall consist of money transferred under subsection (c) and money appropriated or otherwise made available to it.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1296PN1492 - 4 - 1234567891011121314